Mississippi, session 2026, HB1642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 79-4-14.21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 79-4-14.21.  (a)  If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-4-14.20 for dissolving a corporation, he shall serve the corporation with written notice of his determination.  Such determination may be served * * *either by electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the corporation * * * or by first‑class mail as indicated by the corporation. (b)  If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date.  The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation, which certificate may be served * * *either by electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the corporation * * * or by first‑class mail as indicated by the corporation. (c)  A corporation that has been administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except as necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under Section 79-4-14.05 and notify claimants under Sections 79-4-14.06 and 79-4-14.07. (d)  The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent. (e)  The administrative dissolution of a corporation shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien, or act of the corporation or prevent the corporation from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state. (f)  A corporation that has been administratively dissolved may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until the corporation is reinstated. SECTION 2.  Section 79-4-15.31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 79-4-15.31.  (a)  If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-4-15.30 for revocation of a certificate of authority, he shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of his determination under Section 79-4-15.10, except that such determination may be served by * * *first‑class mail electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the corporation. (b)  If the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under Section 79-4-15.10, the Secretary of State may revoke the foreign corporation's certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date.  The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under Section 79-4-15.10, except that such certificate may be served by * * *first‑class mail electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the corporation. (c)  The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority. (d)  The Secretary of State's revocation of a foreign corporation's certificate of authority appoints the Secretary of State the foreign corporation's agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in this state.  Service of process on the Secretary of State under the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure is service on the foreign corporation.  Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or in any subsequent communication received from the corporation stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for a certificate of authority. (e)  Revocation of a foreign corporation's certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation. (f)  The administrative revocation of a foreign corporation's certificate of authority shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien or act of such foreign corporation or prevent the foreign corporation from defending any action, suit or proceeding with any court of this state. (g)  A foreign corporation whose registration has been administratively revoked may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until such foreign corporation's certificate of authority has been reinstated. SECTION 3.  Section 79-29-823, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 79-29-823.  (1)  If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-29-821 for administratively dissolving a limited liability company, the Secretary of State shall serve the limited liability company with written notice of the determination under Section 79-35-13.  Such determination may be served * * *either by electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the limited liability company * * *or by first‑class mail as indicated by the limited liability company. (2)  If the limited liability company does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after the service of the notice, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the limited liability company by signing a certification of the administrative dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date.  The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate of administrative dissolution and serve the limited liability company with a copy of the certificate of administrative dissolution under Section 79-35-13, which certificate of administrative dissolution may be served * * *either by electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the limited liability company * * * or by first‑class mail as indicated by the limited liability company. SECTION 4.  Section 79-29-1023, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 79-29-1023.  (1)  If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-29-1021 for administrative revocation of registration, the Secretary of State shall serve the foreign limited liability company with written notice of the determination under Section 79-35-13, except that such determination may be served by * * * first‑class mail electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the foreign limited liability company. (2)  If the foreign limited liability company does not correct each ground for administrative revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after the service of the notice, the Secretary of State may administratively revoke the foreign limited liability company's registration by signing a certificate of administrative revocation that recites the ground or grounds for administrative revocation and its effective date.  The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate of administrative revocation and serve the foreign limited liability company with a copy of the certificate of administrative revocation under Section 79-35-13, except that such certificate of administrative revocation may be served by * * *first‑class mail electronic mail to the email address of the registered agent of the foreign limited liability company. (3)  The authority of a foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate of administrative revocation. (4)  The Secretary of State's administrative revocation of a foreign limited liability company's registration appoints the Secretary of State the foreign limited liability company's agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign limited liability company was authorized to transact business in this state.  Service of process on the Secretary of State under this subsection is service on the foreign limited liability company.  Upon receipt of process and the payment of the fee specified in Section 79-35-13, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign limited liability company at the office of its registered agent, or if the agent has resigned or cannot be located, at its principal office shown in its most recent communication received from the foreign limited liability company stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for registration of foreign limited liability company. (5)  Administrative revocation of a foreign limited liability company's registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign limited liability company. (6)  The administrative revocation of the registration of a foreign limited liability company shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien or act of such foreign limited liability company or prevent the foreign limited liability company from defending any action, suit or proceeding with any court of this state. (7)  A member, manager or officer of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for the debts, obligations or liabilities of such foreign limited liability company solely by reason of the administrative revocation of the registration of a foreign limited liability company. (8)  A foreign limited liability company whose registration has been administratively revoked may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until such foreign limited liability company's registration has been reinstated.  An action, suit or proceeding may not be maintained in any court of this state by any successor or assignee of such foreign limited liability company on any right, claim or demand arising out of the transaction of business by a foreign limited liability company after the administrative revocation. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.